Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 11

Enhancement Program for Debt Financing of Capital Projects

4-31-1101. Part definitions — Eligibility — Purposes — Application and review procedure.

For the purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

“Authority”, “construction”, and “education project” as defined in § 4-31-1003;

“Available local capital outlay funds” means, with respect to any LGU or LEA, the state share of the capital outlay portion of the nonclassroom component of the BEP funding as set forth in the formula model established or revised by the state board of education, or any replacement funding, approved by the general assembly from time to time, that the LGU or LEA is entitled to receive;

“Basic education program” (BEP) and “local education agency” (LEA) as defined in § 49-3-302;

“Education debt” means debt issued, together with any debt issued to renew or refund the debt, by any LGU to finance the construction of education projects subject to an agreement entered into pursuant to this part;

“Enhancement program” means the program established pursuant to this part; and

“Local government unit” (LGU), as defined in § 4-31-102.

Only LGUs funding the local share of the BEP for an LEA shall be eligible to participate in the program under this part.

The authority, in conjunction with the department of education, is empowered and is authorized to develop an enhancement program under which legally available state funds and available local capital outlay funds assigned or pledged by the LGU or LEA may be applied to one (1) or more of the following purposes for education debt issued by LGUs:

To pay the debt service on or to provide for the payment of debt service on such debt; or

To provide reserves for such debt.

The department of education, in conjunction with the authority, shall develop an application and review procedure for requests under this enhancement program. The department of education shall review each proposed education project and shall make recommendations to the authority as to the applications. The department shall monitor education projects during the term of the agreements required by § 4-31-1102.

Acts 2005, ch. 211, § 1.

4-31-1102. Program provisions.

Any program established by the authority pursuant to this part may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the parties and shall additionally include, among other things, in substance, the following:

The structural requirements of the education debt issued by the LGU, including payment dates, maturity schedule, interest rates, and paying agent;

The coverage requirement for the available local capital outlay funds, provided that the maximum annual debt service on the education debt can be no greater than the available local capital outlay funds in the prior fiscal year divided by 1.25;

A description and estimated costs of the education project; and

An agreement by the LGU and the LEA to:

Proceed expeditiously with, and use its best efforts to complete, the education project;

Commence operation of the education project as soon as possible after completion, and not to use the education project for any purpose not approved pursuant to this part, and not to discontinue operations or dispose of the education project without the prior approval of the authority and the department of education;

Operate and maintain the project in accordance with applicable provisions of this part and rules and regulations of the department of education;

Assign or pledge available local capital outlay funds; and

Cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records of the LEA each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, and to furnish a copy of each such audit to the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 2005, ch. 211, § 1.

4-31-1103. Assignment or pledge of local capital outlay funds as security — Procedures.

Each LGU issuing education debt, as well as any LEA for which education debt is issued, are authorized to assign or pledge for the further security of the education debt the available local capital outlay funds, whether such debt is issued pursuant to title 9, chapter 21, or title 49, chapter 3, and to assign or pledge to the authority all right and interest in such funds to be used by the authority as permitted under this part.

Upon the approval of an application, the authority shall notify the commissioner of finance and administration, indicating the identity of the participating LGU and LEA and the terms of the assignment or pledge. The authority shall submit a certified copy of the debt service schedule for the education debt to the commissioner of finance and administration. The commissioner of finance and administration shall be entitled to rely on such schedule or other submitted documentation, without any further review or investigation. Notwithstanding § 49-3-101(b), the commissioner shall withhold and pay such sum from the available local capital outlay funds to the authority pursuant to any assignment or pledge.

Any earnings on such funds after receipt by the authority and prior to payment on the education debt shall accrue to the benefit of the authority.

The lien of any assignment or pledge pursuant to this part shall be valid and binding as of the time it is made, and as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the LGU, the LEA, or the authority, regardless of whether such parties have notice of those claims. Recording of the resolution or any other instrument by which the assignment or pledge is created is not required. This part and the agreement required by § 4-31-1102 shall in all respects govern the creation, perfection, priority and enforcement of such assignment or pledge, and title 47, chapter 9 shall not govern such matters.

Acts 2005, ch. 211, § 1.